Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-105
Deputies; counsels, examiners, and assistants; salaries; bond or insurance.

(1) The director may employ such deputies, counsels, examiners, and other assistants as he or she may need to discharge in a proper manner the duties imposed upon him or her by law. The deputies, counsels, examiners, and other assistants shall perform such duties as are assigned to them. The employment of any person in the work of the department is subject to section 49-1499.07.

(2) Deputies and financial institution examiners shall hold office at the will of the director and shall receive such salary as set by the director and approved by the Governor based upon the level of credentials for the positions.

(3) The deputies, counsels, examiners, and other assistants, before assuming the duties of office, shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 3, p. 135;

Laws 1933, c. 19, § 3, p. 186;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-1,124;

Laws 1943, c. 13, § 1, p. 77;

R.S.1943, § 8-103;

Laws 1945, c. 238, § 19, p. 712;

Laws 1947, c. 16, § 3, p. 97;

Laws 1951, c. 311, § 1, p. 1065;

Laws 1955, c. 9, § 1, p. 74;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-103;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 5, p. 135;

Laws 1973, LB 164, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1053, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 85, § 1;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 6.